Florida, session 2026, SB412.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 12 13 Section 1.âSubsection (2) of section 947.165, Florida 14 Statutes, is amended to read: 15 947.165âObjective parole guidelines.â 16 (2)âAt least once a year, the commission shall review the 17 objective parole guidelines and make any revisions considered 18 necessary by virtue of statistical analysis of commission 19 actions, which analysis uses acceptable research and 20 methodology. Upon completion of the review, the commission shall 21 provide the statistical analysis to the President of the Senate 22 and the Speaker of the House of Representatives. 23 Section 2.âSubsection (3) of section 947.174, Florida 24 Statutes, is amended to read: 25 947.174âSubsequent interviews.â 26 (3)âThe department shall, within a reasonable amount of 27 time, make available and bring to the attention of the 28 commission such information as is deemed important to the review 29 of the presumptive parole release date, including, but not 30 limited to, current progress reports, psychological reports, and 31 disciplinary reports, as well as information regarding an 32 inmateâs use of vocational training, substance abuse treatment, 33 educational programs, and other self-betterment programs. The 34 commission shall review such information in determining whether 35 to modify an inmateâs presumptive parole release date. 36 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.